District of Columbia statutes.
2-1601

Redesignation of Legal Aid Agency as Public Defender Service.

The Legal Aid Agency for the District of Columbia is redesignated the District of Columbia Public Defender Service (hereafter in this chapter referred to as the “Service”).

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 654, Pub. L. 91-358, title III, § 301
1981 Ed., § 1-2701.
1973 Ed., § 2-2221.